Colorado, session 2026A, HB1055.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Youth across Colorado face very different levels of
opportunities within the communities where they live and learn;
(b) Many youth live and learn in areas that would be considered
opportunity deserts, which are places where there is limited or no
equitable access to cultural, arts, recreational, or extracurricular facilities;
-2- HB26-1055

(c) This lack of opportunity contributes to mental health
challenges, social isolation, neighborhood detachment, academic
struggles, and strain on the overall well-being of youth;
(d) Colorado is full of opportunities that should be available to all
youth, no matter their zip code, affirming that all of Colorado belongs to
our youth; and
(e) Given the ongoing mental health crisis among youth, it is
imperative that Colorado is committed to leveraging all partnerships and
places to ensure protective factors and to eliminate the risk factors that
keep youth from realizing their full potential.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that Colorado should
create a pilot program that allows youth to have equitable access to
cultural, arts, recreational, and extracurricular facilities, within and
beyond the zip codes that they live and learn in.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-1-139 as
follows:
25-1-139. My Colorado card pilot program - creation of pilot
program - selection of pilot communities - participating facilities -
report - definitions - sunset review - repeal.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "COMMUNITY-LED ORGANIZATION" MEANS AN ORGANIZATION
THAT IS RUN BY INDIVIDUALS FROM THE COMMUNITY THAT THE
ORGANIZATION HELPS OR THAT IS AUTHORIZED BY INDIVIDUALS OF THE
COMMUNITY TO HELP THE COMMUNITY.
(b) "COORDINATION TEAM" MEANS A GROUP OF NO LESS THAN
SEVEN PERSONS COMPRISED OF:
-3- HB26-1055

(I) EDUCATORS AND SCHOOL OFFICIALS;
(II) COMMUNITY-LED ORGANIZATIONS;
(III) ELECTED OFFICIALS;
(IV) BUSINESSES AND SERVICE PROVIDERS;
(V) PARENTS AND GUARDIANS; AND
(VI) STUDENTS.
(c) "CULTURAL, ARTS, RECREATIONAL, OR EXTRACURRICULAR
FACILITY" OR "FACILITY" MEANS A MUSEUM, CULTURAL INSTITUTION,
LIBRARY, ARTS ORGANIZATION, RECREATION CENTER, PARK, SPORTS
FACILITY, AFTER-SCHOOL PROGRAM SITE, OR OTHER COMMUNITY-BASED
FACILITY THAT PROVIDES YOUTH ENRICHMENT OPPORTUNITIES.
(d) "MY COLORADO CARD" MEANS A PHYSICAL OR DIGITAL CARD
THAT ENABLES YOUTH PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM TO ACCESS
CULTURAL, ARTS, RECREATIONAL, OR EXTRACURRICULAR FACILITIES THAT
PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(e) "OPPORTUNITY DESERT" MEANS A GEOGRAPHIC AREA IN THE
STATE WHERE YOUTH LACK REASONABLE ACCESS TO CULTURAL, ARTS,
RECREATIONAL, OR EXTRACURRICULAR FACILITIES DUE TO ECONOMIC,
GEOGRAPHIC, TRANSPORTATION, OR SYSTEMIC BARRIERS.
(f) "PILOT PROGRAM" MEANS THE MY COLORADO CARD PILOT
PROGRAM CREATED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(g) "RURAL RESERVATION COMMUNITY" MEANS A COMMUNITY
THAT IS LOCATED ON OR PRIMARILY SERVING A FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED
TRIBAL RESERVATION IN THE STATE.
(h) "SELECTED PILOT COMMUNITY" MEANS A PILOT COMMUNITY
THAT IS SELECTED FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE PILOT PROGRAM BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
-4- HB26-1055

(i) "YOUTH" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL IN GRADES SIX THROUGH
TWELVE.
(2) Creation of pilot program - administration by the
department.
(a) THE MY COLORADO CARD PILOT PROGRAM IS CREATED IN THE
DEPARTMENT TO IMPROVE YOUTH MENTAL HEALTH OUTCOMES BY
PROVIDING YOUTH WITH ACCESS TO CULTURAL, ARTS, RECREATIONAL, OR
EXTRACURRICULAR FACILITIES THROUGHOUT THE STATE. THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PILOT PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION.
(b) IN THE DEPARTMENT'S ADMINISTRATION OF THE PILOT
PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) DEVELOP A MY COLORADO CARD FOR USE BY THE YOUTH
PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM;
(II) SELECT PILOT COMMUNITIES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT
PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION;
(III) COORDINATE WITH THE SELECTED PILOT COMMUNITIES AND
COMMUNITY-LED ORGANIZATIONS TO:
(A) IDENTIFY YOUTH IN THE SELECTED PILOT COMMUNITIES TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT PROGRAM;
(B) FACILITATE ACCESS TO CULTURAL, ARTS, RECREATIONAL, OR
EXTRACURRICULAR FACILITIES IN AREAS THROUGHOUT THE STATE FOR
YOUTH PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM; AND
(C) COLLECT NONIDENTIFYING PARTICIPATION DATA FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THE EVALUATION AND REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION;
(IV) COORDINATE WITH COMMUNITY-LED ORGANIZATIONS TO
-5- HB26-1055

PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO SELECTED PILOT COMMUNITIES
RELATED TO:
(A) MENTAL-HEALTH-INFORMED AND TRAUMA-INFORMED
PROGRAMMING PRACTICES;
(B) SHARED-USE AGREEMENTS FOR CULTURAL, ARTS,
RECREATIONAL, OR EXTRACURRICULAR FACILITIES;
(C) PARTNERSHIPS WITH COMMUNITY-LED ORGANIZATIONS, LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS, AND TRIBAL AUTHORITIES; AND
(D) IDENTIFICATION OF TRANSPORTATION STRATEGIES USING
EXISTING RESOURCES; AND
(V) COORDINATE WITH OTHER STATE AGENCIES AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS IN THE DEPARTMENT'S ADMINISTRATION OF THE PILOT
PROGRAM, AS APPROPRIATE, TO UTILIZE EXISTING YOUTH-SERVING
RESOURCES IN FURTHERANCE OF THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(c) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT DATA COLLECTED
THROUGH THE PILOT PROGRAM:
(A) IS LIMITED TO NONIDENTIFYING PARTICIPATION DATA;
(B) DOES NOT INCLUDE SENSITIVE PERSONAL, ACADEMIC, OR
HEALTH INFORMATION; AND
(C) COMPLIES WITH ALL APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL PRIVACY
LAWS.
(II) DATA COLLECTED THROUGH THE PILOT PROGRAM SHALL NOT
BE USED FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT, IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT, OR
DISCIPLINARY PURPOSES.
(3) Pilot communities - participating facilities.
(a) NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 30, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT,
AFTER OBTAINING FEEDBACK AND RECOMMENDATIONS FROM
-6- HB26-1055

COMMUNITY-LED ORGANIZATIONS NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 1, 2026,
SHALL SELECT A LIMITED NUMBER OF PILOT COMMUNITIES IN THE STATE
TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT PROGRAM, WHICH COMMUNITIES MUST
COLLECTIVELY REPRESENT:
(I) URBAN COMMUNITIES;
(II) RURAL COMMUNITIES; AND
(III) RURAL RESERVATION COMMUNITIES.
(b) IN SELECTING PILOT COMMUNITIES, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONSIDER:
(I) GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY ACROSS THE STATE;
(II) COMMUNITIES IDENTIFIED AS OPPORTUNITY DESERTS; AND
(III) BARRIERS TO YOUTH ACCESS TO CULTURAL, ARTS,
RECREATIONAL, OR EXTRACURRICULAR FACILITIES, INCLUDING
TRANSPORTATION BARRIERS.
(c) (I) A SELECTED PILOT COMMUNITY SHALL APPOINT A
COORDINATION TEAM TO SUPPORT YOUTH PARTICIPATION IN THE PILOT
PROGRAM.
(II) THE SELECTION OF A COMMUNITY AS A PILOT COMMUNITY
DOES NOT LIMIT YOUTH IN THAT SELECTED PILOT COMMUNITY FROM
ACCESSING CULTURAL, ARTS, RECREATIONAL, OR EXTRACURRICULAR
FACILITIES THROUGH THE PILOT PROGRAM IN OTHER PARTS OF THE STATE.
(III) A SELECTED PILOT COMMUNITY MAY:
(A) COORDINATE TRANSPORTATION SCHEDULES;
(B) SUPPORT SHARED-USE OR INTERGOVERNMENTAL
TRANSPORTATION AGREEMENTS; OR
(C) PROMOTE WALKABLE OR LOCALLY ACCESSIBLE CULTURAL,
ARTS, RECREATIONAL, OR EXTRACURRICULAR FACILITIES.
-7- HB26-1055

(d) THE DEPARTMENT AND A SELECTED PILOT COMMUNITY MAY
ENCOURAGE FACILITIES PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM TO:
(I) OFFER FREE OR REDUCED-PRICE ACCESS TO YOUTH
PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM DURING DESIGNATED TIMES;
(II) RESERVE CAPACITY FOR YOUTH PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT
PROGRAM WHEN FEASIBLE; AND
(III) ALIGN HOURS OF OPERATION WITH AFTER-SCHOOL HOURS OR
NONSCHOOL HOURS.
(e) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION REQUIRES:
(I) A COMMUNITY OR CULTURAL, ARTS, RECREATIONAL, OR
EXTRACURRICULAR FACILITY IN THE STATE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT
PROGRAM;
(II) A FACILITY PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM TO:
(A) WAIVE FEES;
(B) PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION;
(C) ALTER CAPACITY LIMITS OR HOURS OF OPERATION; OR
(D) DISPLACE EXISTING PROGRAMMING; OR
(III) A SELECTED PILOT COMMUNITY TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION
OR CREATE A NEW SERVICE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(4) Evaluation and reporting.
(a) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL EVALUATE THE PILOT PROGRAM ON
AN ANNUAL BASIS TO ASSESS:
(I) YOUTH PARTICIPATION IN THE PILOT PROGRAM;
(II) GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY OF FACILITIES PARTICIPATING IN THE
PILOT PROGRAM;
(III) OBSERVED INDICATORS OF ENGAGEMENT AND WELL-BEING OF
THE YOUTH PARTICIPATING IN THE PILOT PROGRAM; AND
-8- HB26-1055

(IV) BARRIERS TO ACCESS TO FACILITIES PARTICIPATING IN THE
PILOT PROGRAM, INCLUDING TRANSPORTATION BARRIERS.
(b) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH
DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO
THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES, OR ANY SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, SUMMARIZING:
(I) THE RESULTS OF THE EVALUATION CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION AND STRATEGIES IMPLEMENTED BY
THE DEPARTMENT BASED ON THE RESULTS OF THE EVALUATION;
(II) OBSERVED OUTCOMES AND CHALLENGES OF THE PILOT
PROGRAM; AND
(III) RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE CONTINUATION OR
MODIFICATION OF THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(5) Gifts, grants, or donations. THE DEPARTMENT MAY SEEK,
ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR
PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.
(6) Sunset review - repeal. THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE
SEPTEMBER 1, 2031. BEFORE THE REPEAL, THIS SECTION IS SCHEDULED
FOR REVIEW IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-34-104.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, add
(32)(a)(XVI) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies
and functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(32) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2031:
-9- HB26-1055

(XVI) THE MY COLORADO CARD PILOT PROGRAM CREATED IN
SECTION 25-1-139.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-10- HB26-1055